Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER TO THE PREWEATHERIZATION ACCOUNT.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the renewable development account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the preweatherization account under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.264, subdivision 1c. This is a onetime transfer. new text end